Maryland, session 2026, HB0901.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
8–404.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0901*

HOUSE BILL 901
(a) The State Board shall adopt, as regulations, standards for the identification,
evaluation, educational placement, and the provision of a free appropriate public education
of each child in this State who has begun the school year under the age of 21 and is found
to need special education and related services, whether or not the child is receiving
nonduplicative services from another governmental agency.
(E) (1) A SCHOOL SHALL RECOGNIZE A STUDENT’S EXTERNAL DIAGNOSIS
OF AUTISM FROM A MEDICAL, MENTAL HEALTH, OR EDUCATIONAL PROFESSIONAL
AS A DIAGNOSIS UNTIL AN INITIAL EVALUATION OF THE STUDENT IS COMPLETED BY
THE SCHOOL.
(2) FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION, A MEDICAL, MENTAL
HEALTH, OR EDUCATIONAL PROFESSIONAL INCLUDES:
(I) A LICENSED DEVELOPMENTAL PEDIATRICIAN;
(II) A LICENSED CLINICAL PSYCHOLOGIST;
(III) A LICENSED PSYCHIATRIST;
(IV) A LICENSED CLINICAL SOCIAL WORKER WITH AUTISM
DIAGNOSIS TRAINING;
(V) A LICENSED SPEECH–LANGUAGE PATHOLOGIST WORKING
AS PART OF A MULTIDISCIPLINARY DIAGNOSTIC TEAM; AND
(VI) A LICENSED OCCUPATIONAL THERAPIST WORKING AS PART
OF A MULTIDISCIPLINARY DIAGNOSTIC TEAM.
(3) A SCHOOL SHALL INITIATE A SCHOOL–BASED EVALUATION OF A
STUDENT WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING:
(I) AN EXTERNAL DIAGNOSIS OF AUTISM; AND
(II) WRITTEN CONSENT FROM THE STUDENT’S PARENT.
(4) (I) DURING THE EVALUATION PERIOD, A SCHOOL SHALL
PROVIDE TO A STUDENT WITH AN EXTERNAL AUTISM DIAGNOSIS THE SUPPORTS
RECOMMENDED IN THE DIAGNOSIS.
(II) A SCHOOL MAY PROVIDE ALTERNATIVE SUPPORTS TO A
STUDENT WHEN A SPECIFIC RECOMMENDATION:
1. CONFLICTS WITH FEDERAL OR STATE LAW; OR

HOUSE BILL 901 3
2. PRESENTS A SAFETY RISK.
(III) A SCHOOL SHALL CONTINUE TO PROVIDE SUPPORTS TO A
STUDENT UNTIL:
1. THE SCHOOL–BASED EVALUATION IS COMPLETED;
AND
2. A DETERMINATION IS MADE REGARDING WHETHER A
STUDENT SHOULD CONTINUE TO RECEIVE SUPPORTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.